Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-105
Seal; office; employees.

The commissioners shall be known collectively as the Public Service Commission and shall have a seal, which may be either an engraved or ink stamp seal, similar to the seal of this state, with the words Public Service Commission of Nebraska included thereon. They shall be furnished with offices and with necessary furniture, stationery, and supplies. Immediately after a newly elected member of the commission has taken the oath of office prescribed in section 75-102, the commission shall meet at Lincoln and organize. The commission shall also appoint employees as may be necessary to perform the duties which may be required of the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 5, p. 1356;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 28.